California statutes. Corporations Code
(a) If a person required by this title to sign a record or deliver a record to the Secretary of State for filing under this title does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the superior court to order any of the following: 

(1) The person to sign the record. 

(2) The person to deliver the record to the Secretary of State for filing. 

(3) The Secretary of State to file the record unsigned. 

(b) If a petitioner under subdivision (a) is not the limited liability company
 or foreign limited liability company to which the record
 pertains, the petitioner shall make the limited liability company a party to the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17702.05.

(a) A record authorized or required to be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this title shall be captioned to describe the record’s purpose, be in a medium permitted by the Secretary of State, and be delivered to the Secretary of State. If the filing fees have been paid, unless the Secretary of State determines that a record does not comply with applicable laws, the Secretary of State shall file the record. 

(b) Upon request and payment of the requisite fee, the Secretary of State shall send to the requester a certified copy of a requested record. 

(c) Except for original articles of
 organization and except as otherwise provided in Sections 17701.14 and 17702.06, a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this title may specify a delayed effective date. Subject to Section 17702.06, a record filed by the Secretary of State is effective as follows: 

(1) If the record does not specify a delayed effective date, on the date the record is filed as evidenced by the Secretary of State’s endorsement of the date on the record. 

(2) If the record specifies a delayed effective date, on the date specified in the record. A delayed effective date specified in the record shall not be more than 90 days after the date the record is filed.

(d) In the case of a delayed effective date, the instrument may
 be prevented from becoming effective by a certificate stating that by appropriate action it has been revoked and is null and void. This certificate shall be executed in the same manner as the original instrument and shall be filed before the delayed effective date.

(e) In the case of a merger agreement or certificate of merger, a certificate revoking the earlier filing need only be executed on behalf of one of the constituent parties to the merger. If no revocation certificate is filed, the instrument becomes effective on the date specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17702.06.

(a) A limited liability company or foreign limited liability company may deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of correction on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State to correct a record previously delivered by the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company to the Secretary of State and filed by the Secretary of State, if at the time of filing the record contained inaccurate information or was defectively signed.

(b) A certificate of correction under subdivision (a) may not state a delayed effective date and shall do all of the following:

(1) State the present name of the limited liability company or foreign
 limited liability company and the Secretary of State’s file number.

(2) Describe the title to the document to be corrected, including its filing date.

(3) Set forth the name of each party to the document to be corrected.

(4) Specify the inaccurate information and the reason it is inaccurate or the manner in which the signing was defective.

(5) Correct the defective signature or inaccurate information.

(c) A certificate of correction shall be executed in the same manner in which the record being corrected was required to be executed.

(d) When filed by the Secretary of State, a certificate of correction under subdivision (a) is
 effective retroactively as of the effective date of the record the certificate corrects, but the statement is effective when filed as to persons that previously relied on the uncorrected record and would be adversely affected by the retroactive effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 42.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17702.07.

(a) If a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this title and filed by the Secretary of State contains inaccurate information, a person that suffers a loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from the following: 

(1) A person that signed the record, or caused another to sign it on the person’s behalf, and knew the information to be inaccurate at the time the record was signed. 

(2) Subject to subdivision (b), a member of a member-managed limited liability company or the manager of a manager-managed limited liability company, if all of the following
 apply: 

(A) The record was delivered for filing on behalf of the limited liability company. 

(B) The member or manager had notice of the inaccuracy for a reasonably sufficient time before the information was relied upon so that, before the reliance, the member or manager reasonably could have done all of the following: 

(i) Effected an amendment under Section 17702.02. 

(ii) Filed a petition under Section 17702.04. 

(iii) Delivered to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of information under Section 17701.14 or a certificate of correction under Section 17702.06. 

(b) To the extent that the operating agreement of a member-managed limited liability company expressly relieves a
 member of responsibility for maintaining the accuracy of information contained in records delivered on behalf of the limited liability company to the Secretary of State for filing under this title and imposes that responsibility on one or more other members, the liability stated in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) applies to those other members and not to the member that the operating agreement relieves of the responsibility. 

(c) An individual who signs a record authorized or required to be filed under this title affirms under penalty of perjury that the information stated in the record is accurate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17702.09.

(a) Every limited liability company and every foreign limited liability company registered to transact intrastate business in this state shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing within 90 days after the filing of its original articles of organization or registering to transact intrastate business and biennially thereafter during the applicable filing period, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, a statement of information containing:

(1) The name of the limited liability company and the Secretary of State’s file number and, in the case of a foreign limited liability company, the name under which the foreign limited liability company is authorized to transact intrastate business in this state and the state or other jurisdiction under the laws
 of which it is organized.

(2) The name and street address of the agent in this state for service of process required to be maintained pursuant to Section 17701.13. If a corporate agent is designated, only the name of the agent shall be set forth.

(3) The street address of its principal office. In the case of a foreign limited liability company, the street address of its principal business office in this state, if any, and, in the case of a domestic limited liability company, the street address of the office required to be maintained pursuant to Section 17701.13.

(4) The mailing address of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, if different from the street address of its principal office, or principal business office in this state, or, in the case of a domestic limited liability company,
 the street address of the office required to be maintained pursuant to Section 17701.13.

(5) The name and complete business or residence addresses of any manager or managers and the chief executive officer, if any, appointed or elected in accordance with the articles of organization or operating agreement or, if no manager has been so elected or appointed, the name and business or residence address of each member.

(6) If the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company chooses to receive renewal notices and any other notifications from the Secretary of State by electronic mail instead of by United States mail, the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company shall include a valid electronic mail address for the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, or for the limited liability company’s or foreign limited liability
 company’s designee to receive those notices.

(7) The general type of business that constitutes the principal business activity of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, such as, for example, manufacturer of aircraft, wholesale liquor distributor, or retail department store.

(8) (A) For a manager-managed limited liability company or a manager-managed foreign limited liability company, a statement indicating whether any manager has an outstanding final judgment issued by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement or a court of law, for which no appeal therefrom is pending, for the violation of any wage order or provision of the Labor Code. 

(B) For a member-managed limited liability company, a statement indicating whether any member has an outstanding final judgment
 issued by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement or a court of law, for which no appeal therefrom is pending, for the violation of any wage order or provision of the Labor Code, unless, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 17701.10, a written operating agreement limits the members who are agents of the limited liability company for the purpose of its business and affairs to a specified member or specified members, in which case the statement is only required with respect to the specified member or members.

(C) For a foreign limited liability company that is not managed by a manager or managers, a statement indicating whether any member has an outstanding final judgment issued by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement or a court of law, for which no appeal therefrom is pending, for the violation of any wage order or provision of the Labor Code, unless the member is not an agent of the foreign limited liability company for purposes of
 its business and affairs, in which case the statement is only required with respect to the member or members who are agents of the foreign limited liability company.

(b) If there has been no change in the information contained in the last filed statement of information of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company on file in the office of Secretary of State, the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company may, in lieu of filing the statement of information required by subdivision (a), advise the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, that no changes in the required information have occurred during the applicable filing period.

(c) For purposes of this section, the applicable filing period for a limited liability company shall be the calendar month during which its original articles of organization was filed
 or, in the case of a foreign limited liability company, the month during which its application for registration was filed, and the immediately preceding five calendar months. The Secretary of State shall provide a notice to each limited liability company or foreign limited liability company to comply with this section approximately three months prior to the close of the applicable filing period. The notice shall state the due date for compliance and shall be sent to the last mailing address of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company according to the records of the Secretary of State, or if none, to the street address of the principal office, or, in the case of a domestic limited liability company, the office required to be maintained pursuant to Section 17701.13, or to the last electronic mail address according to the records of the Secretary of State if the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company has elected to receive notices from the Secretary of State by
 electronic mail. The failure of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company to receive the notice shall not exempt the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company from complying with this section.

(d) Whenever any of the information required by subdivision (a) changes, other than the name and address of the agent for service of process, the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company may file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivision (a). When changing its agent for service of process or when the address of the agent changes, the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company shall file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivision (a). Whenever any statement is filed pursuant to this section, that statement supersedes any previously filed statement pursuant to this section, the statement in the original
 articles of organization, and the statement in any previously filed amended or restated articles of organization that have been filed, or in the case of a foreign limited liability company, in the application for registration.

(e) If a statement of information delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this section does not contain the information required by subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall promptly return the statement of information to the reporting limited liability company or foreign limited liability company for correction.

(f) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any statement filed pursuant to this section after it has been superseded by the filing of a new statement.

(g) (1) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022, or upon
 certification by the Secretary of State that California Business Connect is implemented, whichever date is earlier.

(2) If the Secretary of State certifies California Business Connect is implemented prior to January 1, 2022, the Secretary of State shall post notice of the certification on the home page of its internet website and send notice of the certification to the Legislative Counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 331, Sec. 1.   (AB 2431)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17702.10.

An instrument shall be deemed filed, and the date of filing endorsed thereon, upon receipt by the Secretary of State of any instrument accompanied by the fee prescribed in Article 3 (commencing with Section 12180) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The date of filing shall be the date the instrument is received by the Secretary of State unless the instrument provides that it is to be withheld from filing for a period of time not to exceed 90 days or unless, in the judgment of the Secretary of State, the filing is intended to be coordinated with the filing of some other document that cannot be filed. The Secretary of State shall file a document as of any requested future date not more than 90 days after its
 receipt, including a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, if that document is received in the office of the Secretary of State at least one business day prior to the requested date of filing. Upon receipt and after filing of any document under this title, the Secretary of State may microfilm or reproduce by other techniques any filings or documents and destroy the original filing or document. The microfilm or other reproduction of any document under this section, or corresponding provision under prior law, shall be admissible in any court of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 3. Relations of Members and Managers to Persons Dealing with a Limited Liability Company [17703.01. - 17703.04.]

17703.01.

(a) Unless the articles of organization indicate the limited liability company is a manager-managed limited liability company, every member is an agent of the limited liability company for the purpose of its business or affairs, and the act of any member, including, but not limited to, the execution in the name of the limited liability company of any instrument, for the apparent purpose of carrying on in the usual way the business or affairs of the limited liability company of which that person is a member, binds the limited liability company in the particular matter, unless the member so acting has, in fact, no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter and the person with whom the member
 is dealing has actual knowledge of the fact that the member has no such authority.

(b) If the articles of organization indicate that the limited liability company is a manager-managed limited liability company, each of the following applies:

(1) No member acting solely in the capacity of a member is an agent of the limited liability company nor can any member bind or execute any instrument on behalf of the limited liability company.

(2) Every manager is an agent of the limited liability company for the purpose of its business or affairs, and the act of any manager, including, but not limited to, the execution in the name of the limited liability company of any instrument for apparently carrying on in the usual way
 the business or affairs of the limited liability company of which the person is a manager, binds the limited liability company, unless the manager so acting has, in fact, no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter and the person with whom the manager is dealing has actual knowledge of the fact that the manager has no such authority.

(c) No act of a manager or member in contravention of a restriction on authority shall bind the limited liability company to persons having actual knowledge of the restriction.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (c), any note, mortgage, evidence of indebtedness, contract, certificate, statement, conveyance, or other instrument in writing, and any assignment or endorsement thereof, executed or entered
 into between any limited liability company and any other person, when signed by at least two managers, or by one manager in the case of a limited liability company whose articles of organization state that it is managed by only one manager, is not invalidated as to the limited
 liability company by any lack of authority of the signing managers or manager in the absence of actual knowledge on the part of the other person that the signing managers or manager had no authority to execute the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17703.04.

(a) All of the following apply to debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited liability company, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise:

(1) They are solely the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the limited liability company to which the debts, obligations, or other liabilities relate.

(2) They do not become the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a member or manager solely by reason of the member acting as a member or manager acting as a manager for the limited liability company.

(b) A member of a limited
 liability company shall be subject to liability under the common law governing alter ego liability, and shall also be personally liable under a judgment of a court or for any debt, obligation, or liability of the limited liability company, whether that liability or obligation arises in contract, tort, or otherwise, under the same or similar circumstances and to the same extent as a shareholder of a corporation may be personally liable for any debt, obligation, or liability of the corporation; except that the failure to hold meetings of members or managers or the failure to observe formalities pertaining to the calling or conduct of meetings shall not be considered a factor tending to establish that a member or the members have alter ego or personal liability for any debt, obligation, or liability of the limited liability company where the articles of organization or operating agreement do not expressly
 require the holding of meetings of members or managers. 

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the liability of a member of a limited liability company to third parties for the member’s participation in tortious conduct, or pursuant to the terms of a written guarantee or other contractual obligation entered into by the member, other than an operating agreement.

(d) A limited liability company or foreign limited liability company shall carry insurance or provide an undertaking to the same extent and in the same amount as is required by any law, rule, or regulation of this state that would be applicable to the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company were it a corporation organized and existing or duly qualified for the transaction of intrastate
 business under the General Corporation Law.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a member of a limited liability company may agree to be obligated personally for any or all of the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the limited liability company as long as the agreement to be so obligated is set forth in the articles of organization or in a written operating agreement that specifically references this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 4. Relations of Members to Each Other and to the Limited Liability Company  [17704.01. - 17704.10.]

17704.01.

(a) If a limited liability company is to have only one member upon formation, the person becomes a member as agreed by that person and the organizer of the limited liability company. That person and the organizer may be, but need not be, different persons. If different, the organizer acts on behalf of the initial member.

(b) If a limited liability company is to have more than one member upon formation, those persons become members as agreed by the persons before the formation of the limited liability company. The organizer acts on behalf of the persons in forming the limited liability company and may be, but need not be, one of the persons.

(c) After
 formation of a limited liability company, a person becomes a member as follows:

(1) As provided in the operating agreement.

(2) As the result of a transaction effective under Article 10 (commencing with Section 17710.01).

(3) With the consent of all the members.

(4) If, within 90 consecutive days after the limited liability company ceases to have any members, the last person to have been a member, or the legal representative of that person, designates a person to become a member, and the designated person consents to become a member.

(d) A person may become a member without acquiring a transferable interest and without making or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited
 liability company.

(e) Sections 406 and 407 of the Labor Code shall not apply to membership interests issued by any limited liability company or foreign limited liability company to the following persons:

(1) Any employee of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company or of any parent or subsidiary of either, pursuant to a membership interest purchase plan or agreement, or a membership interest option plan or agreement.

(2) In any transaction in connection with securing employment, a person who is or is about to become an officer or a manager of the limited liability company or the foreign limited liability company or of any parent or subsidiary of either.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 5.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.02.

A contribution may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to a limited liability company, including money, services performed, promissory notes, other agreements to contribute money or property, and contracts for services to be performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.03.

(a) A person’s obligation to make a contribution to a limited liability company is not excused by the person’s death, disability, or other inability to perform personally. If a person does not make a required contribution, the person or the person’s estate is obligated to contribute money equal to the value of the part of the contribution that has not been made, at the option of the limited liability company.

(b) The obligation of a member to make a contribution to a limited liability company may be compromised only by consent of all the members. A conditional obligation of a member to make a contribution to a limited liability company shall not be enforced unless the conditions of the obligation have been satisfied or waived as to or by that member. Conditional
 obligations include contributions payable upon a discretionary call of a limited liability company before the time the call occurs.

(c) A creditor of a limited liability company that extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation described in subdivision (a) may enforce the obligation.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the rights of third-party creditors of the limited liability company to seek equitable remedies or any rights existing under the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Civil Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 23.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.04.

(a) Any distributions made by a limited liability company before its dissolution and winding up shall be among the members in accordance with the operating agreement. If the operating agreement does not otherwise provide, distributions shall be on the basis of the value, as stated in the required records when the limited liability company decides to make the distribution, of the contributions the limited liability company has received from each member, except to the extent necessary to comply with any transfer effective under Section 17705.02 and any charging order in effect under Section 17705.03.

(b) A person has a right to a distribution before the dissolution and winding up of a limited liability company only if the
 limited liability company decides to make an interim distribution. Unless the articles of organization or written operating agreement provides otherwise, a person’s dissociation does not entitle the person to a distribution, and, beginning on the date of dissociation, the dissociated person shall have only the right of a transferee of a transferable interest with respect to that person’s interest in the limited liability company, and then only with respect to distributions, if any, to which a transferee is entitled under the operating agreement. If the dissociation is in violation of the operating agreement, the limited liability company shall have the right to offset any damages for the breach of the operating agreement from the amounts, if any, otherwise distributable to the dissociated person with respect to that person’s interest in the limited liability company.

(c) A person does not have a right to demand or receive a distribution from a
 limited liability company in any form other than money. A limited liability company may distribute an asset in kind if each part of the asset is fungible with each other part and each person receives a percentage of the asset equal in value to the person’s share of distributions.

(d) If a member or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the member or transferee has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited liability company with respect to the distribution.

(e) The profits and losses of a limited liability company shall be allocated among the members, and among classes of members, in the manner provided in the operating agreement. If the operating agreement does not otherwise provide, profits and losses shall be allocated in proportion to the value, as stated in the required records, of the contributions the limited
 liability company has received from each member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 6.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.05.

(a) A limited liability company shall not make a distribution if after the distribution either of the following applies:

(1) The limited liability company would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of the limited liability company’s activities.

(2) The limited liability company’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus the amount that would be needed, if the limited liability company were to be dissolved, wound up, and terminated at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution, winding up, and termination
 of members whose preferential rights are superior to those of persons receiving the distribution.

(b) A limited liability company may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subdivision (a) on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), the effect of a distribution under subdivision (a) is measured as follows:

(1) In the case of a distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of a transferable interest in the limited liability company, as of the date money or other
 property is transferred or debt incurred by the limited liability company.

(2) In all other cases, as of the date the distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs within 120 days after that date, or the payment is made, if the payment occurs more than 120 days after the distribution is authorized.

(d) A limited liability company’s indebtedness to a member incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the limited liability company’s indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors.

(e) A limited liability company’s indebtedness, including indebtedness issued in connection with or as part of a distribution, is not a liability for purposes of subdivision (a) if the terms of the indebtedness
 provide that payment of principal and interest are made only to the extent that a distribution could be made to members under this section.

(f) If indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is made.

(g) In subdivision (f) of Section 17701.02, “distribution” does not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past services or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business under a bona fide retirement plan or other benefits program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.06.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), if a member of a member-managed limited liability company or manager of a manager-managed limited liability company consents to a distribution made in violation of Section 17704.05, the member or manager is personally liable to the limited liability company for the amount of the distribution that exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without the violation of Section 17704.05.

(b) To the extent the operating agreement of a member-managed limited liability company expressly relieves a member of the authority and responsibility to consent to distributions and imposes that authority and
 responsibility on one or more other members, the liability stated in subdivision (a) applies to the other members and not the member that the operating agreement relieves of authority and responsibility.

(c) A person that receives a distribution knowing that the distribution to that person was made in violation of Section 17704.05 is personally liable to the limited liability company but only to the extent that the distribution received by the person exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid under Section 17704.05.

(d) A person against which an action is commenced because the person is liable under subdivision (a) may do all of the following:

(1) Implead any other person that is subject to liability
 under subdivision (a) and seek to compel contribution from the person.

(2) Implead any person that received a distribution in violation of subdivision (c) and seek to compel contribution from the person in the amount the person received in violation of subdivision (c).

(e) An action under this section is barred if not commenced within four years after the distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.07.

(a) A limited liability company is a member-managed limited liability company unless the articles of organization contain the statement required by paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 17702.01.

(b) In a member-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

(1) The management and conduct of the limited liability company are vested in the members.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (r), each member has equal rights in the management and conduct of the limited liability company’s activities including equal voting rights.

(3) A difference arising among members as to a matter in the ordinary course of the activities of the limited liability company shall be decided by a majority of the members.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in Article 10 (commencing with Section 17710.01), an act outside the ordinary course of the activities of the limited liability company may be undertaken only with the consent of all members.

(5) The operating agreement may be amended only with the consent of all members.

(c) In a manager-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

(1) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this title, any matter relating to the activities of the limited liability company is decided
 exclusively by the managers.

(2) Each manager has equal rights in the management and conduct of the activities of the limited liability company.

(3) A difference arising among managers as to a matter in the ordinary course of the activities of the limited liability company may be decided by a majority of the managers of the limited liability company.

(4) The consent of all members of the limited liability company is required to do any of the following:

(A) Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of the limited liability company’s property, with or without the goodwill, outside the ordinary course of the limited liability company’s activities.

(B) Except as
 otherwise provided in Article 10 (commencing with Section 17710.01), any other act outside the ordinary course of the limited liability company’s activities.

(5) A manager may be chosen at any time by the consent of a majority of the members and remains a manager until a successor has been chosen, unless the manager at an earlier time resigns, is removed, or dies, or, in the case of a manager that is not an individual, terminates. A manager may be removed at any time by the consent of a majority of the members without cause, subject to the rights, if any, of the manager under any service contract with the limited liability company.

(6) A person need not be a member to be a manager, but the dissociation of a member that is also a manager removes the person as a manager. If a person that is both a manager and a member ceases to be a manager, that cessation does not by itself
 dissociate the person as a member.

(7) A person’s ceasing to be a manager does not discharge any debt, obligation, or other liability to the limited liability company or members which the person incurred while a manager.

(d) Except for such orders as may be made by a court of competent jurisdiction over a dissolution under Section 17707.03, the dissolution of a limited liability company does not affect the applicability of this section. However, a person that wrongfully causes dissolution of the limited liability company loses the right to participate in management as a member and a manager.

(e) This title does not entitle a member to remuneration for services performed for a member-managed limited liability company, except for reasonable compensation for services rendered in winding up the activities of a limited
 liability company.

(f) Meetings of members may be held at any place, by electronic video screen communication or by electronic transmission by and to the limited liability company pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 17701.02, either within or without this state, selected by the person or persons calling the meeting or as may be stated in or fixed in accordance with the articles of organization or a written operating agreement. If no other place is stated or so fixed, all meetings shall be held at the principal office of the limited liability company. Unless prohibited by the articles of organization of the limited liability company, if authorized by the operating agreement, members not physically present in person or by proxy at a meeting of members may, by electronic transmission by and to the limited liability company pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 17701.02 or by electronic video
 screen communication, participate in a meeting of members, be deemed present in person or by proxy, and vote at a meeting of members whether that meeting is to be held at a designated place or in whole or in part by means of electronic transmission by and to the limited liability company or by electronic video screen communication, in accordance with subdivision (l).

(g) A meeting of the members may be called by any manager or by any member or members representing more than 10 percent of the interests in current profits of members for the purpose of addressing any matters on which the members may vote.
